Utah statutes.
9-7-407.   Librarian and other personnel.

(1)  The library board of directors shall appoint a competent person as librarian to have immediate charge of the library with those duties and compensation for services that it determines. The librarian shall act as the executive officer for the library board.

(2)  The board shall appoint, upon the recommendation of the librarian, other personnel as needed.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 241, 1992 General Session

